test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kv35_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # kv_
    á+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: á
    á+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: á
    á+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: á
    á+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: áar
    á+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: áir
    á+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: áum
    á+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: áa
    á+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: áin
    á+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: ánna
    á+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: ánni
    á+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: áarinnar
    á+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: áirnar
    á+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: áunum
    á+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: áanna
    
    
      Noun - : kraft #
    ong+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: ong
    ong+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: ong
    ong+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: ong
    ong+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: eingjar
    ong+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: eingir
    ong+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: eingjum
    ong+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: eingja
    ong+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: [eingin, ongin]
    ong+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: [eingina, ongina]
    ong+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: [eingini, ongini]
    ong+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: eingjarinnar
    ong+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: eingirnar
    ong+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: eingjunum
    ong+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: eingjanna
       
